Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STUDY ON ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS TO MINNESOTA OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.new text end new text begin (a) By January 1, 2027, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must submit a report on the environmental impacts of artificial intelligence to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment policy and energy policy. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an assessment of the energy consumption and pollution associated with the full lifecycle of artificial intelligence models, including the design, development, deployment, and use of those models; new text end new text begin (2) an assessment of the energy consumption and pollution associated with the full lifecycle of artificial intelligence hardware, including the extraction of raw materials, manufacturing, and electronic waste associated with that hardware; new text end new text begin (3) an assessment of the energy and water consumption for cooling the data centers used in the design, development, deployment, and use of artificial intelligence models; new text end new text begin (4) an assessment of how choices made during the design, development, deployment, and use of artificial intelligence models, including the efficiency of the artificial intelligence models used; the location, power source, and design of data centers used; and the type of hardware used, affect the resulting environmental impacts; new text end new text begin (5) identification of potential environmental impacts that could be acute at local scales, which may include added power loads that create grid stress, water withdrawals that create water stress, or local noise impacts; new text end new text begin (6) identification of the positive environmental impacts associated with applications of artificial intelligence, which may include optimizing systems for energy efficiency, developing renewable energy, advancing planetary systems research, enabling discovery of new materials, and automatically monitoring environmental changes; new text end new text begin (7) identification of the negative environmental impacts associated with applications of artificial intelligence, which may include rebound effects, behavioral impacts, and accelerating high-pollution activities; new text end new text begin (8) identification of disparate impacts in the negative environmental impacts of artificial intelligence; new text end new text begin (9) an estimate of the likely impact to Minnesota of the various factors identified in the report under various artificial intelligence deployment scenarios; and new text end new text begin (10) any other environmental impacts determined to be relevant by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) In conducting the study required by this section, the commissioner must provide opportunities for engagement with stakeholders, including those with knowledge or expertise in subjects relevant to the study and report required by this section, and with interested members of the general public. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STUDY ON THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS TO MINNESOTA OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to conduct the study and prepare the report required by section 1. new text end